New Jersey, session 221, S872.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    N.J.S.54A:6-7 is amended to read as follows: 54A:6-7.  a.  Compensation paid by the United States for service in the Armed Forces of the United States performed by an individual not domiciled in this State. b.    Amounts received during the taxable year as mustering-out payments with respect to service in the Armed Forces of the United States. c.    Amounts received during the taxable year as housing and subsistence allowances by members of the active and reserve components of the Armed Forces of the United States, and by New Jersey National Guard members while on State active duty. d.    Amounts received during the taxable year as bonuses for reenlistment or voluntary extension of enlistment by members of the Armed Forces of the United States. (cf: P.L.2005, c.63) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to taxable years beginning on or after the January 1 next following enactment.